Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2429.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 66 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 2807.1. Hosting capacity maps. (a) Duties of electric distribution companies.--(1) By July 1, 2027, each electric distribution company shall develop and make publicly available distribution system hosting capacity maps on the electric distribution company's publicly accessible Internet website for respective service territories, which shall be updated every two months and prioritize feeders or nodes that experienced significant changes since the electric distribution company's previous update.1234567891011121314151617 (2) The commission may require each electric distribution company to include additional data points to improve transparency and planning, as necessary.(3) An electric distribution company may SHALL establish an online portal or registration process that enables a person to verify the person's identity to receive access to the hosting capacity maps on the electric distribution company's publicly accessible Internet website. AUTHORIZES AN ELIGIBLE PERSON TO ACCESS THE HOSTING CAPACITY MAPS UPON VERIFICATION THAT THE ELIGIBLE PERSON IS ENGAGED IN A PROJECT OR OTHER LEGITIMATE BUSINESS PURPOSE RELATED TO THE DISTRIBUTION NETWORK.(4) The commission shall ensure that an electric distribution company does not discriminate against, hinder or deny a AN ELIGIBLE person that properly requests access to the electric distribution company's distribution system hosting capacity maps. A AN ELIGIBLE person may file a complaint with the commission if the person believes the electric distribution company has denied or prevented access to an electric distribution company's hosting capacity map in violation of this section.(b) Hosting capacity websites.--The commission shall publish a list of hyperlinks for each electric distribution company hosting capacity map website on the commission's publicly accessible Internet website.(c) Standards.--The commission shall establish uniform reporting standards for consistency across each electric distribution company within nine months of the effective date of this subsection, subject to a stakeholder proceeding. At a minimum, standards shall address data format, methodology for 20260HB2429PN3575 - 2 - <--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 calculating load hosting capacity, threshold criteria for constraint disclosure and map user interface requirements.(d) Preapplication period.--(1) Within 30 days of the effective date of this subsection, each electric distribution company shall develop a preapplication report that provides general locational information to a person that proposes to interconnect new load or generation to the distribution system upon request, which shall include the proximity to distribution lines operating at a nominal voltage of at least 4 kV, existing interconnected generation and load, distribution system capacity and constraints relevant to interconnection viability and any other relevant information identified by the commission.(2) An electric distribution company shall provide the locational information to the person that proposes to interconnect to the distribution system within seven business days after a request is submitted to the electric distribution company.(e) Requirements.--The hosting capacity maps under subsection (a) shall include, at a minimum, the following:(1) Total available distribution system hosting capacity, expressed in kilowatts, for new loads.(2) A unified interface which shall identify the following:(i) A single unified interface with filtering or toggling mechanisms designed to identify the following:(A) Available hosting capacity for new load interconnections . (B) Available capacity for distributed energy 20260HB2429PN3575 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 resource interconnection.(C) A distribution system constraint or characteristic identified by the commission as relevant to siting decisions for new large loads or generation.(ii) Existing and queued distributed energy resources.(iii) Distribution system constraints.(3) Display of circuit hosting capacity at circuit-level granularity, including feeder subsections.(4) Forecasts of approved system upgrades.(5) Geographic locations and voltage levels of circuits.(6) Available circuit capacity expressed in kilowatts.(7) Disclosure of constraints or limiting criteria identified by color coding system, which are evaluated by the hosting capacity analysis for thermal, anti-islanding and voltage, for the purpose of identifying capacity limits.(f) Reliability reports.--Each electric distribution company shall publish an annual reliability report which shall include the following metrics, identified per circuit:(1) System average interruption frequency index, representing the average number of interruptions per interrupted customer.(2) Customer average interruption duration index, representing the average interruption duration or average time to restore service per interrupted customer.(3) Customers experiencing multiple interruptions, identifying customers experiencing at least five interruptions annually divided by the total number of customers served.20260HB2429PN3575 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) Customers experiencing long interruption durations, identifying customers that have experienced outages of one or more hours in duration divided by the total number of customers served.(5) Average outage frequency and duration per circuit and substation.(6) Identification of circuits and substations with persistent reliability issues.(7) Planned and completed upgrades to enhance grid reliability.(8) Other reliability metrics that the commission deems appropriate.(g) Commission review.--The commission shall hold an annual public input hearing to receive input from relevant stakeholders on hosting capacity map design, necessary updates, accuracy and usability.(h) Complaint process.--The commission shall promulgate regulations to establish a customer complaint process for any alleged violations of the hosting capacity map standards and requirements established in this section. A violation of this section shall be subject to enforcement by the commission under Chapter 33 (relating to violations and penalties).(i) Applicability.--This section shall not apply to an electric distribution company with less than 100,000 customers.(J) DEFINITIONS.--AS USED IN THIS SECTION, THE FOLLOWING WORDS AND PHRASES SHALL HAVE THE MEANINGS GIVEN TO THEM IN THIS SUBSECTION UNLESS THE CONTEXT CLEARLY INDICATES OTHERWISE:"ELIGIBLE PERSON." A PERSON INVOLVED IN DISTRIBUTED ENERGY RESOURCE DEVELOPMENT, INTERCONNECTION ANALYSIS OR ENGINEERING OR ENERGY PLANNING RELATING TO A DISTRIBUTION NETWORK. THE TERM 20260HB2429PN3575 - 5 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 SHALL INCLUDE, BUT NOT BE LIMITED TO, THE FOLLOWING:(1) A HOLDER OF A PENNSYLVANIA PROFESSIONAL ENGINEER LICENSE.(2) A HOLDER OF A PENNSYLVANIA HOME IMPROVEMENT CONTRACTOR REGISTRATION.(3) A HOLDER OF AN ELECTRICAL CONTRACTOR OR ELECTRICIAN LICENSE, CERTIFICATION, REGISTRATION OR PERMIT REQUIRED BY A STATE AGENCY OR GOVERNMENTAL BODY.(4) A SOLAR PROFESSIONAL CERTIFIED BY THE NORTH AMERICAN BOARD OF CERTIFIED ENERGY PRACTITIONERS.(5) A PERSON WITH AN ACTIVE REGIONAL TRANSMISSION ORGANIZATION OR UTILITY INTERCONNECTION QUEUE POSITION.(6) A PERSON WITH AN EXECUTED UTILITY CONFIDENTIALITY AGREEMENT.(7) A PERSON ACTING ON BEHALF OF A PROSPECTIVE CUSTOMER GENERATOR.(8) ANY OTHER ENERGY PROFESSIONAL AS DETERMINED BY THE COMMISSION.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 90 days.20260HB2429PN3575 - 6 - 12345678910111213141516171819